Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act
14 C.J.S., Charities § 81.

§79-11-281.
Indemnification of director, officer, employee, or agent.

In this section:

“Director” means an individual who is or was a director of a corporation or an individual who, while a director of a corporation, is or was serving at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise. A director is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the corporation’s request if his duties to the corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, him to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. “Director” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a director.

“Expenses” includes counsel fees.

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine (including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan) or reasonable expenses incurred with respect to a proceeding.

“Official capacity” means: (i) when used with respect to a director, the office of director in a corporation; or (ii) when used with respect to an individual other than a director, as contemplated in subsection (8) of this section, the office in a corporation held by the officer or the employment or agency relationship undertaken by the employee or agent on behalf of the corporation. “Official capacity” does not include service for any other foreign or domestic corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise.

“Party” includes an individual who was, is, or is threatened to be made a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

“Proceeding” means any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or investigative and whether formal or informal.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a corporation may indemnify an individual made a party to a proceeding because he is or was a director against liability incurred in the proceeding if:

He conducted himself in good faith; and

He in good faith believed:

In the case of conduct in his official capacity with the corporation that his conduct was in its best interests; and

In all other cases, that his conduct was at least not opposed to its best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, he had no reasonable cause to believe his conduct was unlawful.

A director’s conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose he reasonably believed to be in the interests of the participants in and beneficiaries of the plan is conduct that satisfies the requirement of subsection (2)(b)(ii) of this section.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement or conviction is not, of itself, determinative that the director did not meet the standard of conduct described in this section.

A corporation may not indemnify a director under this section:

In connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation in which the director was adjudged liable to the corporation; or

In connection with any other proceeding charging improper personal benefit to him, whether or not involving action in his official capacity, in which he was adjudged liable on the basis that personal benefit was improperly received by him.

Indemnification permitted under this section in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation is limited to reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding.

Unless limited by its articles of incorporation, a corporation shall indemnify a director who entirely prevails in the defense of any proceeding to which he was a party because he is or was a director of the corporation against reasonable expenses incurred by him in connection with the proceeding.

A corporation may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final disposition of the proceeding if:

The director furnishes the corporation a written statement of his good faith belief that he has met the standard of conduct described in subsection (2) of this section;

The director furnishes the corporation a written undertaking, executed personally or on his behalf, to repay the advance if it is ultimately determined that he did not meet the standard of conduct; and

A determination is made that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under Section 79-11-101 et seq.

The undertaking required by subsection (5)(b) of this section shall be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment.

Determinations and authorizations of payment under this section shall be made in the manner specified in subsection (7) of this section.

Unless limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation, a director of the corporation who is a party to a proceeding may apply for indemnification to the court conducting the proceeding or seek indemnification in another court of competent jurisdiction. The court may order indemnification if it determines:

The director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under subsection (4) of this section, in which case the court shall also order the corporation to pay the director’s reasonable expenses incurred to obtain court-ordered indemnification; or

With respect to a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the director is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnification in view of all the relevant circumstances, even though he was adjudged liable, but any indemnification shall be limited to reasonable expenses incurred.

A corporation may not indemnify a director under subsection (2) of this section unless authorized in the specific case after a determination has been made that indemnification of the director is permissible in the circumstances because he has met the standard of conduct set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

The determination shall be made:

1. Selected by the board of directors or its committee in the manner prescribed in subparagraph (i) or (ii) of this paragraph; or

2. If a quorum of the board of directors cannot be obtained under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and a committee cannot be designated under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph selected by majority vote of the full board of directors (in which selection directors who are parties may participate); or

By the board of directors by majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors not at the time parties to the proceeding;

If a quorum cannot be obtained under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, by a majority vote of a committee duly designated by the board of directors (in which designation directors who are parties may participate), consisting solely of two (2) or more directors not at the time parties to the proceeding;

By special legal counsel:

By the members but with the parties to the proceeding not being permitted to vote on the determination.

Authorization of indemnification and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that if the determination is made by special legal counsel, authorization of indemnification and evaluation as to reasonableness of expenses shall be made by those entitled under subsection (7)(a)(iii) of this section to select counsel.

Unless limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation:

An officer of the corporation is entitled to mandatory indemnification under subsection (2) of this section and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification under subsection (6) of this section, in each case to the same extent as a director;

The corporation may indemnify and advance expenses under Section 79-11-101 et seq. to an officer, employee or agent of the corporation to the same extent as to a director.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, or who, while a director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation, is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against liability asserted against or incurred by him in that capacity or arising from his status as a director, officer, employee or agent, whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify him against the same liability under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, any authorization of indemnification in the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall not be deemed to prevent the corporation from providing the indemnity permitted or mandated by this section.

Any corporation shall have power to make any further indemnity, including advance of expenses, to and to enter into contracts of indemnity with any director, officer, employee or agent that may be authorized by the articles of incorporation or any bylaw made by the members (or if there are no members, by the board of directors) or any resolution adopted, before or after the event, by the members (or if there are no members, by the board of directors), except an indemnity against his failure to act in accordance with the standard of conduct provided in Section 79-11-267 or 79-11-275, as applicable. Unless the articles of incorporation, or any such bylaw or resolution provide otherwise, any determination as to any further indemnity shall be made in accordance with subsection (7)(a) of this section. Each such indemnity may continue as to a person who has ceased to have the capacity referred to above and may inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of such a person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 91, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (5)(c) and (8)(b) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Pursuant to
Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected a typographical error near the end of the first sentence in subsection (11) by substituting “ Section 79-11-267 or
79-11-275” for “ Sections 79-11-267 or
79-11-275.” The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its August 1, 2013, meeting.

Indemnification of directors, officers under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-8.50 through 79-4-8.59.

Indemnification of corporation director, see §§ 79-4-8.51, 79-4-8.52, 79-4-8.54.

Indemnification of corporation officer, see § 79-4-8.56.

Requirement that notice of meetings of members include a description of any matters which must be approved by the members under this section, see § 79-11-205.

Director who was acquitted on indictment charging embezzlement for personal benefit was not “adjudged liable” within meaning of statute which prohibits corporation from indemnifying director in connection with proceeding charging improper personal benefit, if director was adjudged liable on basis that personal benefit was improperly received. Murphree v. Federal Ins. Co., 707 So. 2d 523, 1997 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1997).

Mere indictment of director for embezzlement for personal profit or advantage does not entitle corporation to deny indemnification on basis of statute permitting corporation to reimburse reasonable expenses incurred by director in advance of final disposition of proceeding, if determination is made that facts then known to those making determination would not preclude indemnification; another portion of statute called for director to be adjudged liable before indemnification could be denied, and indictment was not equal to being adjudged liable. Murphree v. Federal Ins. Co., 707 So. 2d 523, 1997 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1997).

Advice of counsel was not valid excuse for corporation’s denial of director’s request for indemnification after director was indicted for embezzlement for personal benefit; attorneys misread plain language of statute that called for director to be adjudged liable before indemnification could be denied, and corporation heeded attorneys’ advice at its own risk. Murphree v. Federal Ins. Co., 707 So. 2d 523, 1997 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1997).

Corporation’s motivation in denying director’s request for indemnification before his acquittal on charge of embezzlement for personal benefit presented question of fact precluding summary judgment on claim of bad faith breach of contractual duty to indemnify director, even though no judicial interpretation existed concerning statute on indemnification of director, and case allegedly presented matter of first impression. Murphree v. Federal Ins. Co., 707 So. 2d 523, 1997 Miss. LEXIS 145 (Miss. 1997).

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Charities § 178.

§79-11-282.
Restrictions on corporate loans; borrower’s liability.

A corporation may not lend money to or guarantee the obligation of a director or officer of the corporation.

The fact that a loan or guarantee is made in violation of this section does not affect the borrower’s liability on the loan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-403.

§79-11-283.
Recordkeeping requirements.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its members and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the members or directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by committees of the board of directors as authorized by Section 79-11-265.

A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its members in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all members, in alphabetical order by class showing the number of votes each member is entitled to vote.

A corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in any other form of a record.

A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

Its articles or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its board of directors relating to the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations and obligations of members or any class or category of members;

The minutes of all meetings of members and records of all actions approved by the members for the past three (3) years;

All written communications to members generally within the past three (3) years;

A list of the names and business or home addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Its most recent status report delivered to the Secretary of State under Section 79-11-391.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 92; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 13, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, substituted “any other form of a record” for “another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time” at the end of (4).

Member’s right to inspect and copy corporation records, see § 79-11-285.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership lists. 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

§79-11-285.
Members’ right to inspect and copy corporation records; requirements.

Subject to Section 79-11-287(3), a member is entitled to inspect and copy, at a reasonable time and location specified by the corporation, any of the records of the corporation described in Section 79-11-283(5) if the member gives the corporation written notice of his demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy.

A member is entitled to inspect and copy, at a reasonable time and reasonable location specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation if the member meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section and gives the corporation written notice at least five (5) business days before the date on which the member wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from any records required to be maintained under Section 79-11-283(1), to the extent not subject to inspection under subsection (1) of this section;

Accounting records of the corporation; and

Subject to Section 79-11-291, the membership list.

A member may inspect and copy the records identified in subsection (2) of this section only if:

The member’s demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

The member describes with reasonable particularity the purpose and the records the member desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with this purpose.

This section does not affect:

The right of a member to inspect records if the member is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant; or

The power of a court, independently of Section 79-11-101 et seq., to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 93, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (4)(b) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Applicability of this section to member’s right to copy corporation’s list of members entitled to notice of meeting, see § 79-11-213.

Inspection and copying of corporate records, see § 79-11-287.

Authority of chancery court to order inspection and copying of records if corporation does not allow member to inspect and copy records under this section, see § 79-11-289.

Stockholder’s right to inspect books and records of foreign corporation. 19 A.L.R.3d 869.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership list. 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 291, 298, 335.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 231-251.

§79-11-287.
Conditions on right to inspect; member’s agent or attorney has right to inspect and copy records; means of copying records; charges for copying documents by corporation; lists which satisfy demand for record of members.

A member’s agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the member the agent or attorney represents.

The right to copy records under Section 79-11-285 includes, if reasonable, the right to receive copies. Copies may be provided through an electronic transmission if available and so requested by the member.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the member. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

The corporation may comply with a member’s demand to inspect the record of members under Section 79-11-285(2)(c) by providing the member with a list of its members that was compiled no earlier than the date of the member’s demand.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 94; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 14, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, deleted “made by photographic, xerographic or other means” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence in (2).

Member’s right to inspect and copy corporation records, see § 79-11-285.

Stockholder’s right to inspect books and records of foreign corporation. 19 A.L.R.3d 869.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership list. 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 291, 298, 335.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 231-251.

§79-11-289.
Court-ordered inspection where corporation does not allow member to inspect and copy records.

If a corporation does not allow a member who complies with Section 79-11-285(1) to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the chancery court in the county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may summarily order inspection and copying of the records demanded at the corporation’s expense upon application of the member.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a member to inspect and copy any other record, the member who complies with Section 79-11-285(2) and (3) may apply to the chancery court in the county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the member’s costs (including reasonable attorney’s fees) incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the member to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding member.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 95; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 59, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” for “principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located” in (1) and (2).

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership list. 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 291, 298, 335.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 231-251.

§79-11-291.
Restrictions on use of membership lists.

Without consent of the board, a membership list or any part thereof may not be obtained or used by any person for any purpose unrelated to a member’s interest as a member. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, without the consent of the board a membership list or any part thereof may not be:

Used to solicit money or property unless such money or property will be used solely to solicit the votes of the members in an election to be held by the corporation;

Used for any commercial purpose; or

Sold to or purchased by any person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 96, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Applicability of this section to member’s right to copy corporation’s list of members entitled to notice of meeting, see § 79-11-213.

Member’s right to inspect and copy corporation records, see § 79-11-285.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership list. 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 291, 228, 335.

§79-11-293.
Authorization for making distributions; conditions for corporation to purchase memberships.

Except as authorized under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a corporation shall not make any distributions.

A corporation may purchase its memberships if after the purchase is completed:

The corporation would be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its activities; and

The corporation’s total assets would at least equal the sum of its total liabilities.

A corporation may make distributions upon dissolution in accordance with the provisions of Section 79-11-101 et seq. relating to dissolution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 97, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (3) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Authorization for corporation to purchase membership of member who resigns or whose membership is terminated, see § 79-11-191.

Liability of director for unlawful distribution, see § 79-11-270.

Distribution of funds by nonprofit corporation absent dissolution. 51 A.L.R.3d 1318.

6 Am. Jur. 2d, Associations and Clubs § 60.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 2279, 2281, 2298, 2299, 2418, 2488.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Fraternal Orders and Benefit Societies §§ 153, 156.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:863, 74:866.

§79-11-295.
Authorization to amend articles of incorporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation, from time to time, in any and as many respects as may be desired, so long as its articles of incorporation as amended contain only such provisions as are lawful under Section 79-11-101 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 98, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in the section was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-10.01 through 79-4-10.09.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:936.

§79-11-297.
Amendment of articles of incorporation prior to corporation’s acquisition of members.

If a corporation has not yet acquired members, its incorporators or board of directors may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 99, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-10.01 through 79-4-10.09.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Application of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§ 79-11-101 et seq.) to amendment of articles of incorporation of “private foundations” (as defined in 26 USCS § 509(a)), see § 79-11-57.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Manner of making amendments to articles of incorporation where provisions of this section are not applicable, see § 79-11-301.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:936.

§79-11-299.
Amendments to articles of incorporation which may be adopted by board of directors without action by members.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a corporation’s board of directors may adopt one or more amendments to the corporation’s articles of incorporation without action by members:

To extend the duration of the corporation if it was incorporated at a time when limited duration was required by law;

To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

To change the information required by Section 79-35-5(a);

To make any other change expressly permitted by Section 79-11-101 et seq. to be made without member action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 100; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 60, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

In 2009, a typographical error in paragraph (d) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (c), which previously read: “To delete the name and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the Secretary of State.”

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-10.01 through 79-4-10.09.

Application of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§ 79-11-101 et seq.) to amendment of articles of incorporation of “private foundations” (as defined in 26 USCS § 509(a)), see § 79-11-57.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Manner of making amendments to articles of incorporation where provisions of this section are not applicable, see § 79-11-301.

Manner of making amendments to articles of incorporation in a restatement, where provisions of this section are not applicable, see § 79-11-307.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:936.

§79-11-301.
Procedures for making amendments to articles of incorporation.

Except as provided in Sections 79-11-297 and 79-11-299, amendments to the articles of incorporation shall be made in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed amendment and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected thereby shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting within the time and in the manner provided in Section 79-11-101 et seq. for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The proposed amendment shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds (2/3) of votes cast or a majority of the voting power, whichever is less.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, an amendment shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Any number of amendments may be submitted and voted upon at any one meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 101, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in paragraph (a) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-10.01 through 79-4-10.09.

Application of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§ 79-11-101 et seq.) to amendment of articles of incorporation of “private foundations” (as defined in 26 USCS § 509(a)), see § 79-11-57.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Requirement that notice of meetings of members include a description of any matters which must be approved by the members under this section, see § 79-11-205.

Applicability of this section to restatement of corporation’s articles of incorporation, see § 79-11-307.

Board of trustees of orphanage organized as nonprofit corporation are members of corporation entitled to adopt and approve amendment to corporate charter, to exclusion of governing body of church which created corporation, where corporate charter contains no provision regarding membership in corporation and trustees have assumed all powers of membership. Allgood v. Bradford, 473 So. 2d 402, 1985 Miss. LEXIS 2145 (Miss. 1985).

A charter amendment changing the domicil of a corporation from one county to another is not required to be recorded in the former county. Bob Milner Rentals, Inc. v. Moon, 246 Miss. 326, 149 So. 2d 473, 1963 Miss. LEXIS 446 (Miss. 1963).

Contention that religious organization’s charter, granted prior to adoption of Constitution in 1890, exempting property from taxation violated Constitution prohibiting passage of local, private, or special laws exempting property from taxation involved question of effect of amendment of organization’s charter after adoption of Biloxi v. Trustees of Mississippi Annual Conference Endowment Fund, 179 Miss. 47, 173 So. 797, 1937 Miss. LEXIS 9 (Miss. 1937).

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:936.

§79-11-303.
Amendments to articles affecting members of class to be voted on by members of such class.

The members of a class are entitled to vote as a class on a proposed amendment to the articles if the amendment would:

Affect the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption or transfer of memberships in a manner different than such amendment would affect another class;

Change the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of that class as to voting, dissolution, redemption or transfer by changing the rights, privileges, preferences, restrictions or conditions of another class;

Increase or decrease the number of memberships authorized for that class;

Increase the number of memberships authorized for another class;

Effect an exchange, reclassification or termination of the memberships of that class; or

Authorize a new class of memberships.

If a class is to be divided into two (2) or more classes as a result of an amendment to the articles, the amendment must be approved by the members of each class that would be created by the amendment.

If a class vote is required to approve an amendment to the articles the amendment must be approved by the members of the class by two-thirds (2/3) of the votes cast by the class or a majority of the voting power of the class, whichever is less.

A class of members is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section although the articles and bylaws provide that the class may not vote on the proposed amendment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 102, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-10.01 through 79-4-10.09.

Application of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§ 79-11-101 et seq.) to amendment of articles of incorporation of “private foundations” (as defined in 26 USCS § 509(a)), see § 79-11-57.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Applicability of this section to approval by class of members of plan of merger, see § 79-11-321.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:936.

§79-11-305.
Filing of amendments to articles of incorporation.

A corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment adopted;

The date of each amendment’s adoption;

If an amendment was adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without action by members, a statement to that effect and that action by members was not required;

If an amendment was approved by the members:

The designation, number of memberships outstanding, number of votes entitled to be cast by each class entitled to vote separately on the amendment, and number of votes of each class indisputably represented at the meeting;

Either the total number of votes cast for and against the amendment by each class entitled to vote separately on the amendment or the total number of undisputed votes cast for the amendment by each class and a statement that the number cast for the amendment by each class was sufficient for approval by that voting group.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 103, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-10.01 through 79-4-10.09.

Application of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§ 79-11-101 et seq.) to amendment of articles of incorporation of “private foundations” (as defined in 26 USCS § 509(a)), see § 79-11-57.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Applicability of this section to filing of corporation’s articles of restatement, see § 79-11-307.

A charter amendment changing the domicil of a corporation from one county to another is not required to be recorded in the former county. Bob Milner Rentals, Inc. v. Moon, 246 Miss. 326, 149 So. 2d 473, 1963 Miss. LEXIS 446 (Miss. 1963).

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:936.

§79-11-307.
Restatement of articles of incorporation.

A corporation’s board of directors may restate its articles of incorporation at any time with or without approval by members.

The restatement may include one or more amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring approval by members, it must be adopted as provided in Section 79-11-301.

If the board of directors submits a restatement for approval by members, the corporation shall notify each member of the proposed meeting in accordance with Section 79-11-205. The notice must also state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles.

A corporation restating its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of restatement setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated articles of incorporation together with a certificate setting forth:

Whether the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring approval by the members and, if it does not, that the board of directors adopted the restatement; or

If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring approval by the members, the information required by Section 79-11-305.

Duly adopted restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments to them.

The Secretary of State may certify restated articles of incorporation, as the articles of incorporation currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (4) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 104, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Amendment of articles of incorporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-10.01 through 79-4-10.09.

Application of the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§ 79-11-101 et seq.) to amendment of articles of incorporation of “private foundations” (as defined in 26 USCS § 509(a)), see § 79-11-57.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.